California statutes. Elections Code
Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of the candidate or group of candidates at any time not more than 120 nor less than 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 21.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6857.5.

Before filing, the sections of a nomination paper for a candidate shall be numbered in order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6858.

Nomination papers, properly assembled, may be consolidated and fastened together by counties, but nomination papers signed by voters in different counties shall not be fastened together.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6858.5.

The elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with her or him for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of that county that does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in the office of the elections official. The elections official shall also disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of the county who is not registered as preferring the Green Party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6859.

Within five days after any nomination papers are left with the elections official for examination, the elections official shall do both of the following:

(a) Examine and affix to the nomination papers a certificate reciting that she or he has examined them and stating the number of names that have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(b) Transmit the nomination papers with the certificate of examination to the Secretary of State, who shall file the papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 104.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6859.5.

The certificate of the elections official to nomination papers of a candidate shall be in substantially the following form:CERTIFICATE OF COUNTY ELECTIONS OFFICIAL TO NOMINATION
PAPERS OF A CANDIDATETo the Secretary of State:I, County Elections Official of the County of ______, hereby certify that I have examined the nomination papers, to which
 this certificate is attached, of the presidential candidate, and that the number of names which I have not marked “not sufficient” is _______.
The candidate named in the nomination papers is comprised of the following:_______________________________________________________Dated this ________ day of ________, 20___.________________________(SEAL)County Elections OfficialBy Deputy

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6860.

Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the nomination of a candidate for the presidential preference primary ballot, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate or her or his duly authorized representative of that fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Green Party Presidential Primary Ballot [6861. - 6862.]

6861.

Following the filing of nomination papers, the presidential preference primary candidates shall be printed upon the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6861.5.

For the presidential preference primary election, the format of the Green Party ballot shall be governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, with the following exceptions:

(a) The heading “Presidential Candidate Preference” shall be included.

(b) Selected and unselected presidential candidates shall be listed below the heading specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The instructions to voters shall begin with the words “Vote for a candidate.” The instructions to voters shall also include the statement that “Delegates to the national convention will be selected after the presidential preference primary
 election.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 105.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6862.

A person who believes her or his name may be used as a write-in candidate for President of the United States shall, no later than 21 days before the presidential preference primary election, file an endorsement of her or his write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, or no votes shall be counted for that write-in candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 106.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Certification of National Convention Delegates Election and Postelection Proceedings [6863. - 6863.5.]

6863.

The number of delegates to be selected following the presidential preference primary election shall be the number established by the national political party with which the Green Party is affiliated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 107.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6863.5.

National convention delegates shall be selected as provided for in the bylaws and the rules and procedures of the Green Party and pursuant to the rules of the national political party with which the Green Party is affiliated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Presidential Electors [6864. - 6864.]

6864.

In each year of the general election at which electors of President and Vice President of the United States are to be chosen, the Green Party shall also nominate as the candidates of its party as many electors of President and Vice President of the United States as the state is then entitled, 50 percent of whom shall be women and 50 percent men, unless an odd number of electors is to be chosen, in which case the difference between the number of women and men shall be not more than one elector. The Green Party shall also nominate an alternate elector for each elector chosen, for the purposes of Chapter 1.2 (commencing with Section 6911) of Part 2 of Division 6. The Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State shall certify the name of each elector and alternate
 elector nominated, and the elector's and alternate elector’s residence addresses to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Income Tax Return Disclosure Requirements [6880. - 6884.]

6880.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Presidential Tax Transparency and Accountability Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6881.

The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California has a strong interest in ensuring that its voters make informed, educated choices in the voting booth. To this end, the state has mandated that extensive amounts of information be provided to voters, including county and state voter information guides. The Legislature also finds and declares that a Presidential candidate’s income tax returns provide voters with essential information regarding the candidate’s potential conflicts of interest, business dealings, financial status, and charitable donations. The information in tax returns therefore helps voters to make a more informed decision. The Legislature further finds and declares that as one of the largest centers of economic activity
 in the world, the State of California has a special interest in the President refraining from corrupt or self-enriching behaviors while in office. The people of California can better estimate the risks of any given Presidential candidate engaging in corruption or the appearance of corruption if they have access to candidates’ tax returns. Finally, the State of California has an interest in ensuring that any violations of the Foreign Emoluments Clause of the United States Constitution or statutory prohibitions on behavior such as insider trading are detected and punished. Mandated disclosure of Presidential candidates’ tax returns will enable enforcement of the laws against whichever candidate is elected President. The Legislature finds and declares that compliance costs with this requirement will be trivial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6882.

For purposes of this chapter, “income tax return” means any tax or information return, declaration of estimated tax, or claim for refund required by, or provided for or permitted under, the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, and that is filed on behalf of, or with respect to any person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to, or part of, the return so filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6883.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Secretary of State shall not print the name of a candidate for President of the United States on a primary election ballot, unless the candidate, at least 98 days before the presidential primary election, files with the Secretary of State copies of every income tax return the candidate filed with the Internal Revenue Service in the five most recent taxable years, in accordance with the procedure set forth in Section 6884.

(b) If the candidate has not filed the candidate’s income tax return with the Internal Revenue Service for the tax year immediately preceding the primary election, the candidate shall submit a copy of the
 income tax return to the Secretary of State within five days of filing the return with the Internal Revenue Service.

(c) The requirement in subdivision (a) does not apply to any year in which the candidate was not required to file the candidate’s income tax return with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6884.

(a) The candidate shall submit the following to the Secretary of State:

(1) (A) Two copies of each tax return required by Section 6883. One copy of each tax return shall be identical to the version submitted to the Internal Revenue Service, without redactions. The second copy of each tax return shall be redacted pursuant to this paragraph. The tax returns shall be provided to the Secretary of State in hard-copy form.

(B) The candidate shall redact the following information from the redacted version of each tax return:

(i) Social security numbers.

(ii) Home address.

(iii) Telephone number.

(iv) Email address.

(v) Medical information.

(C) The candidate may also redact the following information from the redacted version of each tax return:

(i) Names of dependent minors.

(ii) Employer identification number.

(iii) Business addresses.

(iv) Preparer tax identification number, address, telephone number, and email address of paid tax return preparers.

(2) A written consent form, signed by the candidate, granting the Secretary of State permission to publicly release a version of the candidate’s tax returns redacted pursuant to this section. The Secretary of State shall prepare a standard consent form consistent with this paragraph.

(b) The Secretary of State shall review the redacted copy of each tax return submitted by the candidate to ensure that the redactions comply with subdivision (a). If the Secretary of State determines that the candidate has redacted information
 other than that permitted by subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall prepare a new version of the tax return with only the redactions permitted by that subdivision.

(c) (1) Within five days of receipt of the candidate’s tax returns, the Secretary of State shall make redacted versions of the tax returns available to the public on the Secretary of State’s internet website. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the Secretary of State shall make public the redacted versions of the tax returns submitted by the candidate pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) If the Secretary of State is required to prepare a redacted version of a tax return pursuant to subdivision (b), the Secretary of State shall make public that version.

(3) The public versions of the tax returns shall be continuously posted until the official canvass for the presidential primary election is completed. Upon completion of the official canvass, the Secretary of State shall remove the public versions of the tax returns.

(4) The Secretary of State shall retain the paper copies of the submitted tax returns until the completion of the official canvass of the ensuing general election. Thereafter, the paper copies of the submitted tax returns shall be destroyed as soon as practicable, unless the Secretary of State has received a court order, or a lawful written request from a state or federal governmental agency, directing the Secretary of State to preserve the submitted tax returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (SB 27)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ELECTIONS FOR PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS [6900. - 6954.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [6900. - 6909.]

6900.

The term “elector” or “presidential elector” as used in this chapter means an elector of President and Vice President of the United States, and not an elector as defined in Section 321.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.

Whenever a political party, in accordance with Section 6864, 7100, 7300, 7578, or 7843, submits to the Secretary of State its certified list of nominees for electors and alternate electors of President and Vice President of the United States, the Secretary of State shall notify each candidate for elector and alternate elector of the elector’s nomination by the party. The Secretary of State shall cause the names of the candidates for President and Vice President of the several political parties to be placed upon the ballot for the ensuing general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 2.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.5.

On or before the 75th day before an election when electors for the President and Vice President of the United States will be chosen, each political party qualified to participate in the election shall notify the Secretary of State of the names of that party’s nominees for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States. If a qualified political party has not held its national convention by the 75th day before the election, the party shall notify the Secretary of State of the names of the party’s apparent nominees for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   (SB 437)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.

At the general election in each leap year, or at any other time as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States, there shall be chosen by the voters of the state as many electors of President and Vice President of the United States as the state is then entitled to.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

On or before the day of meeting of the electors, the Governor shall deliver to the electors a list of the names of electors, and he or she shall perform any other duties relating to presidential electors which are required of him or her by the laws of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6904.

(a) The electors chosen shall assemble at the State Capitol at 2 o’clock in the afternoon on the first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in December next following their election.

(b) If it is unsafe to meet in the State Capitol due to a
 state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including a fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, the Governor shall designate by written proclamation an alternative location for the electors to assemble. The proclamation shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   (AB 507)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6906.

The electors, when convened, shall vote by ballot for a person for President and a person for Vice President of the United States, one of whom, at least, is not an inhabitant of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 4.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6909.

Each presidential elector and alternate elector shall receive ten dollars ($10) for the elector’s services, and mileage at the rate of five cents ($0.05) per mile for each mile of travel from the elector’s domicile to the location of the meeting of the electors and return.

Their accounts therefor shall be certified by the Secretary of State, and audited by the Controller, who shall draw the Controller’s warrants for the same on the Treasurer, payable out of the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 88, Sec. 2.   (AB 507)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.2. Uniform Faithful Presidential Electors Act [6911. - 6919.]

6911.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, as the Uniform Faithful Presidential Electors Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6912.

In this chapter:

(a) “Cast” means accepted by the Secretary of State in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 6917.

(b) “Elector” means an individual who was a nominee for the office of presidential elector pursuant to Section 6864, 7100, 7300, 7578, 7843, 8303, or 8650 and selected as a
 presidential elector under the laws of this state and this chapter.

(c) “President” means President of the United States.

(d) “Unaffiliated presidential candidate” means a candidate for President who qualifies for the general election ballot in this state by means other than nomination by a political party.

(e) “Vice President” means Vice President of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6913.

For each elector position in this state, a political party contesting the position, or an unaffiliated presidential candidate, shall submit to the Secretary of State the names of two qualified individuals. One of the individuals shall be designated “elector nominee” and the other “alternate elector nominee.” Except as otherwise provided in Sections 6915 to 6918, inclusive, this state’s electors are the winning elector nominees under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6914.

(a) Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of a political party shall execute the following pledge: “If selected for the position of elector, I agree to serve and to mark my ballots for President and Vice President for the nominees for those offices of the party that nominated me.”

(b) Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of an unaffiliated presidential candidate shall execute the following pledge: “If selected for the position of elector as a nominee of an unaffiliated presidential candidate, I agree to serve and mark my ballots for that candidate and for that candidate’s vice presidential running mate.”

(c) The pledges executed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall accompany submission of the corresponding names to the Secretary of State.

(d) If, after the nomination of a candidate for President or Vice President by a political party and before the meeting of electors described in Section 6917, the candidate dies or withdraws as a candidate for that office in accordance with the rules of the political party, the pledge described in subdivision (a) applies to the successor candidate for that office nominated by the political party in accordance with the party’s rules.

(e) If, after nomination of an unaffiliated candidate for President or Vice President and before the meeting of electors described in Section 6917,
 the candidate dies or withdraws as a candidate for that office, the pledge described in subdivision (b) applies to the successor candidate for that office nominated by the group of elector nominees of the candidate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6915.

In submitting this state’s certificate of ascertainment as required by Section 6 of Title 3 of the United States Code, the Governor shall certify this state’s electors and state in the certificate that:

(a) The electors will serve as electors unless a vacancy occurs in the office of elector before the end of the meeting at which elector votes are cast, in which case a substitute elector will fill the vacancy.

(b) If a substitute elector is appointed to fill a vacancy, the Governor will submit an amended certificate of ascertainment stating the names on the final list of this state’s
 electors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6916.

(a) The Secretary of State shall preside at the meeting of electors described in Section 6917.

(b) The position of an elector not present to vote is vacant. The Secretary of State shall appoint an individual as a substitute elector to fill a vacancy as follows:

(1) If the alternate elector is present to vote, by appointing the alternate elector for the vacant position.

(2) If the alternate elector for the vacant position is not present to vote, by appointing an elector chosen by lot from among the alternate electors present to vote who were nominated
 by the same political party or unaffiliated presidential candidate.

(3) If the number of alternate electors present to vote is insufficient to fill any vacant position pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), by appointing any immediately available individual who is qualified to serve as an elector and chosen through nomination by an plurality vote of the remaining electors, including nomination and vote by single elector if only one remains.

(4) If there is a tie between at least two nominees for substitute elector in a vote conducted under paragraph (3), by appointing an elector chosen by lot from among those nominees.

(5) If all elector positions are vacant and cannot be filled pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, by
 appointing a single presidential elector, with remaining vacant positions to be filled under paragraph (3) and, if necessary, paragraph (4).

(c) To qualify as a substitute elector under subdivision (b), an individual who has not executed the pledge required under Section 6914 shall execute the following pledge: “I agree to serve and to mark my ballots for President and Vice President consistent with the pledge of the individual to whose elector position I have succeeded.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6917.

(a) At the time designated for elector voting and after all vacant positions have been filled under Section 6916, the Secretary of State shall provide each elector with a presidential and a vice-presidential ballot. The elector shall mark the elector’s presidential and vice-presidential ballots with the elector’s votes for the offices of President and Vice President, respectively, along with the elector’s signature and the elector’s legibly printed name.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by state law other than this chapter, each elector shall present both completed ballots to the Secretary of State, who shall examine the ballots and accept as cast all ballots of electors
 whose votes are consistent with their pledges executed under Section 6914 or subdivision (c) of Section 6916. Except as otherwise provided by state law other than this chapter, the Secretary of State shall not accept and shall not count either an elector’s presidential or vice-presidential ballot if the elector has not marked both ballots or has marked a ballot in violation of the elector’s pledge.

(c) An elector who refuses to present a ballot, presents an unmarked ballot, or presents a ballot marked in violation of the elector’s pledge executed under Section 6914 or subdivision (c) of Section 6916 vacates the office of elector, creating a vacant position to be filled under Section 6916.

(d) The Secretary of State shall distribute ballots to and collect ballots from a
 substitute elector and repeat the process under this section of examining ballots, declaring and filling vacant positions as required, and recording appropriately completed ballots from
 the substituted electors, until all of the state’s electoral votes have been cast and recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6918.

(a) After the vote of this state’s electors is completed, if the final list of electors differs from any list that the Governor previously included on a certificate of ascertainment prepared and transmitted under Section 5 of Title 3 of the United States Code, the Secretary of State immediately shall prepare an amended certificate of ascertainment and transmit it to the Governor for the Governor’s signature.

(b) The Governor immediately shall deliver the signed amended certificate of ascertainment to the Secretary of State and a signed duplicate original of the amended
 certificate of ascertainment to all individuals entitled to receive this state’s certificate of ascertainment, indicating that the amended certificate of ascertainment is to be substituted for the certificate of ascertainment previously submitted.

(c) The Secretary of State shall prepare a certificate of vote. The electors on the final list shall sign the certificate. The Secretary of State shall process and transmit the signed certificate with the amended certificate of ascertainment under Sections 9 to 11, inclusive, of Title 3 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 88, Sec. 3.   (AB 507)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6919.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Voting Compact [6920. - 6921.]

6920.

The Legislature of the State of California hereby ratifies the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote as set forth in Section 6921.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 459)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6921.

The provisions of the Agreement Among the States to Elect the President by National Popular Vote are as follows:

 Article 1. Membership

 

 Any state of the United States and the District of Columbia may become a member of this agreement by enacting this agreement.

 Article 2. Right of the People in Member States to Vote for President and Vice President

 

 Each member state shall conduct a statewide popular election for President and Vice President of the United States.

 Article 3. Manner of Appointing Presidential Electors in Member States

 

 Prior to the time set by law for the meeting and voting by the presidential electors, the chief election official of each member state shall determine the number of votes for each presidential slate in each state of the United States and in the District of Columbia in which votes have been cast in a statewide popular election and shall add such votes together to produce a “national popular vote total” for each
 presidential slate.

The chief election official of each member state shall designate the presidential slate with the largest national popular vote total as the “national popular vote winner.”

The presidential elector certifying official of each member state shall certify the appointment in that official’s own state of the elector slate nominated in that state in association with the national popular vote winner.

At least six days before the day fixed by law for the meeting and voting by the presidential electors, each member state shall make a final determination of the number of popular votes cast in the state for each presidential slate and shall communicate an official statement of such determination within 24 hours to the chief election official of each other member state.

The chief election official of each member state shall treat as
 conclusive an official statement containing the number of popular votes in a state for each presidential slate made by the day established by federal law for making a state’s final determination conclusive as to the counting of electoral votes by Congress.

In event of a tie for the national popular vote winner, the presidential elector certifying official of each member state shall certify the appointment of the elector slate nominated in association with the presidential slate receiving the largest number of popular votes within that official’s own state.

If, for any reason, the number of presidential electors nominated in a member state in association with the national popular vote winner is less than or greater than that state’s number of electoral votes, the presidential candidate on the presidential slate that has been designated as the national popular vote winner shall have the power to nominate the presidential
 electors for that state and that state’s presidential elector certifying official shall certify the appointment of such nominees.

The chief election official of each member state shall immediately release to the public all vote counts or statements of votes as they are determined or obtained.

This article shall govern the appointment of presidential electors in each member state in any year in which this agreement is, on July 20, in effect in states cumulatively possessing a majority of the electoral votes. 

 Article 4. Other Provisions

 

This agreement shall take effect when states cumulatively possessing a majority of
 the electoral votes have enacted this agreement in substantially the same form and the enactments by such states have taken effect in each state.

Any member state may withdraw from this agreement, except that a withdrawal occurring six months or less before the end of a President’s term shall not become effective until a President or Vice President shall have been qualified to serve the next term.

The chief executive of each member state shall promptly notify the chief executive of all other states of when this agreement has been enacted and has taken effect in that official’s state, when the state has withdrawn from this agreement, and when this agreement takes effect generally.

This agreement shall terminate if the electoral college is abolished.

If any provision of this agreement is held invalid, the remaining provisions shall not be
 affected. 

 Article 5. Definitions

 

 For purposes of this agreement, “chief executive” shall mean the governor of a state of the United States or the Mayor of the District of Columbia; “elector slate” shall mean a slate of candidates who have been nominated in a state for the position of presidential elector in association with a presidential slate; “chief election official” shall mean the state official or body that is authorized to certify the total number of popular votes for each presidential slate; “presidential elector” shall mean an elector for President and Vice President of the United States; “presidential elector certifying official” shall mean the state official or body that is authorized to
 certify the appointment of the state’s presidential electors; “presidential slate” shall mean a slate of two persons, the first of whom has been nominated as a candidate for President of the United States and the second of whom has been nominated as a candidate for Vice President of the United States, or any legal successors to such persons, regardless of whether both names appear on the ballot presented to the voter in a particular state; “state” shall mean a state of the United States and the District of Columbia; and “statewide popular election” shall mean a general election in which votes are cast for presidential slates by individual voters and counted on a statewide basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 459)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Duties of the Secretary of State [6950. - 6954.]

6950.

Within three days of receiving the names of delegate candidates from the chairpersons of the steering committees, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each elections official a certified list, for each congressional district wholly or partially within that county, containing the names of the delegate candidates selected and pledged to each candidate or uncommitted delegation who is entitled to be voted for on the ballot at
 the presidential primary.

The certified list shall be in substantially the following form: 
Certified List of Delegate Candidates
In the ____ Congressional District

To the County Elections Official of ____ County:

I, ____, Secretary of State, do hereby certify that the following persons, listed beneath the name of the presidential candidate or uncommitted delegation they are pledged to, are the delegate candidates who will represent the voters of this congressional district at the ____ Democratic National Convention to the extent, based on his or her proportional share of the total votes for president in this district, that each presidential candidate or uncommitted delegation is entitled to delegates from this district.List of Delegates Pledged to Presidential
 Candidates and Uncommitted Delegations
 In the _____ Congressional District
Delegates Pledged to
 Rosaly Lever

 Deborah Seiler
 Elaine Ginnold
 George Mann 
 Darren Chesin
Delegates Pledged to
 Janice Atkinson

 John Mott-Smith
 Rosa Garcia-Viteri
 Bruce Bolinger
 Mary DeLost
Delegates Pledged to
 Christopher Zirkle
Delegates Pledged to
 Unpledged Delegation,
 James Ashford, Chairperson
Mark Terry 
 Romulo Lopez
 Linda M. Gonzalez
 Joe Ayala 
 Lori Joseph
Abra Reynaga
 Sylvia Cheng
 Michael Ognisty
 Bill Pitts
 Lynne ChinnDated at Sacramento, California, this ____ day of ______, 20__.
(seal)______________ Secretary of State

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 82.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6951.

At least 68 days before the presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each elections official a certified list containing the names of the candidates to appear on the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference primary ballot and the names and addresses of the candidates for delegates for whom nomination papers have been filed and who are entitled to be voted for at the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6952.

The certified list required by Section 6951 shall be in substantially the following form:CERTIFIED LIST OF CANDIDATES FOR PRESIDENTIAL
PREFERENCE PRIMARY AND CANDIDATES FOR NATIONAL
CONVENTION DELEGATETo the County Elections Official of ______ County:
I, ____, Secretary of State, do hereby certify that
 the names of the candidates to appear on the June ____, 20__, Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference primary ballot, in the order in which they are to appear, are:etc.etc.I further certify that the following list contains the name and post office address of each person who is entitled to be voted for at the June ____, 20__, Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary
 election as a candidate for delegate to the next national convention of the ____ Party with which the Peace and Freedom Party of California is affiliated on the national level. I further certify that the groups of candidates for delegate each appear under the name of the person for whom the group has expressed a preference as nominee of the Peace and Freedom Party for President, or under the name of the group chairperson in case of a group not expressing a preference, and that the groups are listed in the order in which they are to appear on the national convention delegate portion of the Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary ballot.LIST OF CANDIDATES FOR NATIONAL CONVENTION

 DELEGATE

 PEACE AND FREEDOM PARTY
 Candidates
 preferring
__________________
_________________________________________________________________
 Name AddressTop of group1 2 3 etc.etc.
 Candidates expressing
 no preference
(Name of chairperson)
______________________
_________________________________________________________________
 Name
 AddressTop of group1 2 3 etc.etc.Dated at Sacramento, California, this ____ day of _____, 20___.
(SEAL)
Secretary of State

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 817, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6953.

At least 68 days before a presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each elections official a certified list containing the names and addresses of the candidates for delegates for whom nomination papers have been filed and who are entitled to be voted for at the presidential primary.

The certified list shall be in substantially the following form:

Certified List of Candidates for Delegate
Secretary of State

To the Elections Official of ____ County:

I, ____, Secretary of State, do hereby certify that the following list contains the name and post office address of each person for whom nomination papers have been filed in my office and who is entitled to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, as delegate to the next national convention of the American Independent Party; I further certify that in the list, under the name of the person for whom a preference as nominee of the American Independent Party for President has been expressed, or under the name of the chairman of a group not expressing a preference, there is stated
 the name of each candidate for delegate who has filed a statement pursuant to Section 6567, and who may be voted for as one of a group.LIST OF CANDIDATESAmerican Independent PartyCandidates
 preferring

Candidates
 preferring

 No preference
(Name of chairman)

Name Address
 Top of groupName Address
 Top of groupName Address